Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.340

State employee attendance incentive program—Sick leave records to be kept—Remuneration or benefits for unused sick leave—Medical expense plan in lieu of remuneration.

(1) An attendance incentive program is established for all eligible employees. As used in this section the term "eligible employee" means any employee of the state, other than eligible employees of the community and technical colleges and the state board for community and technical colleges identified in RCW 28B.50.553, and teaching and research faculty at the state and regional universities and The Evergreen State College, entitled to accumulate sick leave and for whom accurate sick leave records have been maintained. No employee may receive compensation under this section for any portion of sick leave accumulated at a rate in excess of one day per month. The state and regional universities and The Evergreen State College shall maintain complete and accurate sick leave records for all teaching and research faculty.

(2) In January of the year following any year in which a minimum of sixty days of sick leave is accrued, and each January thereafter, any eligible employee may receive remuneration for unused sick leave accumulated in the previous year at a rate equal to one day's monetary compensation of the employee for each four full days of accrued sick leave in excess of sixty days. Sick leave for which compensation has been received shall be deducted from accrued sick leave at the rate of four days for every one day's monetary compensation.

From July 1, 2011, through June 29, 2013, the rate of monetary compensation for the purposes of this subsection shall not be reduced by any temporary salary reduction.

(3) At the time of separation from state service due to retirement or death, an eligible employee or the employee's estate may elect to receive remuneration at a rate equal to one day's current monetary compensation of the employee for each four full days of accrued sick leave. From July 1, 2011, through June 29, 2013, the rate of monetary compensation for the purposes of this subsection shall not be reduced by any temporary salary reduction.

(4) Remuneration or benefits received under this section shall not be included for the purpose of computing a retirement allowance under any public retirement system in this state.

(5) Except as provided in subsections (7) through (9) of this section for employees not covered by chapter 41.06 RCW, this section shall be administered, and rules shall be adopted to carry out its purposes, by the director of financial management for persons subject to chapter 41.06 RCW.

(6) Should the legislature revoke any remuneration or benefits granted under this section, no affected employee shall be entitled thereafter to receive such benefits as a matter of contractual right.

(7) In lieu of remuneration for unused sick leave at retirement as provided in subsection (3) of this section, an agency head or designee may with equivalent funds, provide eligible employees with a benefit plan that provides for reimbursement for medical expenses. This plan shall be implemented only after consultation with affected groups of employees. For eligible employees covered by chapter 41.06 RCW, procedures for the implementation of these plans shall be adopted by the director of the state health care authority. For eligible employees exempt from chapter 41.06 RCW, implementation procedures shall be adopted by an agency head having jurisdiction over the employees.

(8) Implementing procedures adopted by the director of the state health care authority or agency heads shall require that each medical expense plan authorized by subsection (7) of this section apply to all eligible employees in any one of the following groups: (a) Employees in an agency; (b) employees in a major organizational subdivision of an agency; (c) employees at a major operating location of an agency; (d) exempt employees under the jurisdiction of an elected or appointed Washington state executive; (e) employees of the Washington state senate; (f) employees of the Washington state house of representatives; (g) classified employees in a bargaining unit established by the public employment relations commission; or (h) other group of employees defined by an agency head that is not designed to provide an individual-employee choice regarding participation in a medical expense plan. However, medical expense plans for eligible employees in any of the groups under (a) through (h) of this subsection who are covered by a collective bargaining agreement shall be implemented only by written agreement with the bargaining unit's exclusive representative and a separate medical expense plan may be provided for unrepresented employees.

(9) Medical expense plans authorized by subsection (7) of this section must require as a condition of participation in the plan that employees in the group affected by the plan sign an agreement with the employer. The agreement must include a provision to hold the employer harmless should the United States government find that the employer or the employee is in debt to the United States as a result of the employee not paying income taxes due on the equivalent funds placed into the plan, or as a result of the employer not withholding or deducting a tax, assessment, or other payment on the funds as required by federal law. The agreement must also include a provision that requires an eligible employee to forfeit remuneration under subsection (3) of this section if the employee belongs to a group that has been designated to participate in the medical expense plan permitted under this section and the employee refuses to execute the required agreement.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 311. Prior: 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 432; 2011 1st sp.s. c 39 s 12; 2002 c 354 s 227; prior: 1998 c 254 s 1; 1998 c 116 s 2; 1997 c 232 s 2; 1993 c 281 s 17; 1991 c 249 s 1; 1990 c 162 s 1; 1980 c 182 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 150 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 39: See note following RCW 41.04.820.

Short title—Headings, captions not law—Severability—Effective dates—2002 c 354: See RCW 41.80.907 through 41.80.910.

Conflict with federal requirements—1998 c 254 s 1: "If any part of RCW 41.04.340 (7) through (9) is found to be in conflict with federal tax laws or rulings or regulations of the federal internal revenue service, the conflicting part is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and such a finding shall not affect the remainder of section 1, chapter 254, Laws of 1998." [ 1998 c 254 s 2.]

Effective date—1993 c 281: See note following RCW 41.06.022.

Severability—1980 c 182: "If any provision of this amendatory act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1980 c 182 s 7.]